assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.dic
abstener/DX
adherir/XD
adormir/XP
advenir/PXD
advertir/XPD
afreir/XD
antever/X
argir/XpD
arrepentir/XDP
astreir/XD
bendecir/XD
caber/XGD
capitidisminuir/XD
ceir/XD
circuir/XD
circunferir/XD
colegir/pDX
comedir/hXPD
competir/XRD
componer/pXh
compungir/XD
concebir/XDP
concluir/XDQ
conferir/XD
constituir/XpD
constreir/XD
construir/pDX
contradecir/X
contrahacer/X
contraponer/XA
contravenir/XD
controvertir/XD
convenir/hDXp
convertir/X
corregir/XP
deferir/XD
derretir/XPD
derruir/XD
desabrir/PDX
desadvertir/X
desavenir/X
desceir/X
desconsentir/X
desfacer/X
desler/XR
desmedir/X
desor/X
desteir/X
destituir/XD
destruir/XD
diferir/XD
difluir/XD
digerir/XQD
diluir/XD
disconvenir/XD
disentir/XPQD
disminuir/XD
distribuir/XpD
dormir/XD
efluir/XD
elegir/XD
embar/XDR
embestir/XBD
engrer/XDR
entrever/X
equivaler/XD
erguir/XDP
esmuir/XD
estatuir/XD
estreir/XPD
excluir/XDQ
expedir/XAD
exponer/XA
fluir/kXfaDp
frer/XDR
fruir/XAD
garantir/XD
gemir/XD
gruir/XD
hacer/Xph
henchir/XPDB
heir/XD
herir/pXPD
hervir/XpD
huir/DpX
imbuir/XD
imponer/hX
inferir/XD
ingerir/XD
injerir/XD
inmiscuir/XD
inserir/XD
instituir/XD
instruir/XD
interferir/XD
intuir/XDA
invertir/X
irruir/XD
luir/XD
maldecir/XD
malherir/XD
manferir/XD
manir/XD
mantener/PXD
manutener/XD
medir/XDA
mentir/hXD
morir/Xn
muir/XD
obstruir/hXD
obtener/XD
ocluir/DXQ
or/DXR
oponer/XA
pedir/hXkD
perseguir/XDP
pervertir/XPDQ
poner/uXoltnkbapgr
posponer/X
preconcebir/X
preelegir/XD
preferir/XD
prevenir/aXD
prever/X
proferir/XD
proseguir/PX
prostituir/XD
receir/X
recluir/XQD
reconvertir/X
redargir/XD
redecir/X
reelegir/XD
reexpedir/XD
referir/XD
refrer/X
regir/XPD
rehacer/XP
rer/XDR
remedir/X
rendir/XDP
reir/XD
repetir/XAD
requerir/XP
reseguir/X
restituir/XD
reteir/X
revertir/XR
rever/X
saber/pDX
salir/rDpX
satisfacer/X
seguir/fXDP
sentir/fDnXaPp
ser/GXDNS
servir/XD
sofrer/XDR
sonrer/XDR
sostener/XDP
subseguir/X
substituir/XD
subvertir/X
sugerir/XQD
suponer/nX
sustituir/XD
taer/XED
tener/XafgjpD
teir/XD
transferir/XD
trasferir/XD
trasor/XDR
trasver/XL
travestir/XD
tribuir/XfapD
valer/nXD
venir/fXtalsorpgDn
ver/jXpbLn
vestir/rXpihkD
yuxtaponer/XA
zaherir/XD
